Washington statutes.
RCW 11.62.030

Payment to surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner of moneys on deposit of deceased credit union member—Limitation—Affidavit—Accounting to personal representative.

On the death of any member of any credit union organized under chapter 31.12 RCW or federal law, such credit union may pay to the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner the moneys of such member on deposit to the credit of said deceased member, including moneys deposited as shares in said credit union, in cases where the amount of deposit does not exceed the sum of one thousand dollars, upon receipt of an affidavit from the surviving spouse or surviving domestic partner to the effect that the member died and no executor or administrator has been appointed for the member's estate, and the member had on deposit in said credit union money not exceeding the sum of one thousand dollars. The payment of such deposit made in good faith to the spouse or the domestic partner making the affidavit shall be a full acquittance and release of the credit union for the amount of the deposit so paid.

No probate proceeding shall be necessary to establish the right of said surviving spouse to withdraw said deposits upon the filing of said affidavit: PROVIDED, That whenever a personal representative is appointed in an estate where a withdrawal of deposits has been had in compliance with this section, the spouse so withdrawing said deposits shall account for the same to the personal representative. The credit union may also pay out the moneys on deposit to the credit of the deceased upon presentation of an affidavit as provided in RCW 11.62.010, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 2008 c 6 s 924; 1980 c 41 s 10.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.

Severability—1980 c 41: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 41 s 13.]